District of Columbia statutes.
46-356.09

Procedure to register child-support order of another state for modification.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a child-support order issued in another state shall register that order in the District in the same manner provided in §§ 46-356.01 through 46-356.08 if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or later. The pleading must specify the grounds for modification.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 609, 63 DCR 222

History